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DI31U-05

DTC P1122/19 | Accel. Closed Position SW Circuit (Short)

DTC P1123/19 | Accel. Closed Position SW Circuit (Open)

Refer to DTC P1120/19 on page DI-67.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

Conditions (a) and (b) continue 0.5 sec. or more:  Shortin accelerator pedal closed position switch circuit
P1122/19 (a) PDLON  Accelerator pedal closed position switch

(b) VA > Fully closed study voltage +0.41 V *EngineECU

PDL does not turn ON even once while driving vehicle

(2 trip detection logic) *Openinaccelaratat, \padalclased positionswitch circuit
P1123/19 Conditions (a) and (b) continue 5 sec. or more: » Accelerator pedal closed position switch

(a) PDL OFF *EngineECU

(b) IDL ON

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P1120/19 on page DI-67.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkaccelerator pedal closed position switch.

PREPARATION:

g Disconnect the accelerator pedal closed position switch con-
nector.

CHECK:

Measure the resistance between terminals of the accelerator
pedal closed position switch.

OK:
Terminals Accelerator pedal Resistance
A05027 1-2 Fully closed 10k Q orhigher
1-2 Fully open 0to 20 Q

NG Replace accelerator pedal closed position
switch (SeePubNo.RM6 17E,pageED -9).
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2 | Check voltage between terminal PDL of engine ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
PDL (a) Removethe glove compartmentdoor.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
‘{%ﬁ\jﬂ% AT I-Illlll I|I|I i I|I|II|I|I Illll CHECK:
(B B ‘ﬁﬁﬁj[%“%’ Measure the voltage between terminal PDL of the engine ECU

w W and body ground.

OK:
Accelerator pedal Voltage
Y A23883 Fully closed 9t0 14V
Fully open 0Oto3V

(See page IN-19).

0K> Check and replace engine ECU

@

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and accelerator pedal
closed position switch and body ground (See page IN-19).
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